test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ID_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kúnid - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ID_STEM_1

     kúnid+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kúnid
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnidaa
     kúnid+V+INDIRECT+PAST: kúnidaan
     kúnid+V+RELATIVE: kúnids
     kúnid+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kúnidaas
     kúnid+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kúnidaa.ang
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kúnidäsaa
     kúnid+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kúnidäs
     kúnid+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kúnidäsaang
     kúnid+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kúnidäsga
     kúnid+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kúnidäsaas
     kúnid+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kúnidäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'uuj
     kúnid+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'uujang
     kúnid+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kúnidäsaa'uujang
     kúnid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kúnid'us
     kúnid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'ujaa
     kúnid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'uujaangaa
     kúnid+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kúnidäsaa'us
     kúnid+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kúnidäsaa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kúnidäseehl
     kúnid+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kúnid'uu
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'waa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'waa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'waang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kúnid'wägan
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'aawaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kúnid'aawaan
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kúnid'waas
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kúnid'aawaas
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'waa.ang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'aawaa.ang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'wägiinii
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'wägaangaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'wägaangaan
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kúnid'waaäsaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kúnid'waaäs
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kúnid'waaäsaang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kúnid'waaäsga
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'waaäsaas
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'waaäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'waa'uuj
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'waa'uujang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kúnid'waaäsaa'uujang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kúnid'waa'us
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'waa'ujaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'waa'uujaangaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'waaäsaa'us
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kúnid'waa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kúnid'waa'ahlanggan
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kúnid'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kúnid'waa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kúnid'aawaa'ahlang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kúnid'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kúnid'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kúnid'waa'ahl
     kúnid+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kúnid'waaäseehl
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kúnid'ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'angga
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'anggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: kúnid'anggan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'aangaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: kúnid'aangaan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: kúnid'ans
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kúnid'aangaas
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'angang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'aangaa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kúnid'anggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'anggiinii
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'anggaangaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'anggaangaan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kúnid'angäsaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kúnid'angäs
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kúnid'angäsaang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kúnid'angäsga
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'angäsaas
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'angäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'uuj
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'uujang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kúnid'angäsaa'uujang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'us
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'ang'ujaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'uujaangaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'angäsaa'us
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kúnid'aang'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: kúnid'aang'ahlanggan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'aang'ahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kúnid'angäsaa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kúnid'aang'ahlans
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: kúnid'aangaa'ahlang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kúnid'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kúnid'aangaa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: kúnid'aang'ahl
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kúnid'angäseehl
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kúnid'ang'uu
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kúnid'ang'wägan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'ang'aawaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kúnid'ang'aawaan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kúnid'ang'waas
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kúnid'ang'aawaas
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'ang'waa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'ang'aawaa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'wägiinii
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'wägaangaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'wägaangaan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kúnid'ang'waaäsaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kúnid'ang'waaäs
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kúnid'ang'waaäsaang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kúnid'ang'waaäsga
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'ang'waaäsaas
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kúnid'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kúnid'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa'uuj
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa'uujang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kúnid'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa'us
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kúnid'ang'waa'ujaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kúnid'ang'waaäsaa'us
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kúnid'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kúnid'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kúnid'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kúnid'ang'waa'ahlans
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kúnid'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kúnid'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kúnid'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kúnid'ang'waa'ahl
     kúnid+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kúnid'ang'waaäseehl
